North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 3. Procedures at the Voting Place.

§ 163-166.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 31.

§ 163-166.01.
Hours for voting.

In every election, the voting place shall be open at 6:30 A.M. and shall be closed at 7:30 P.M. If the polls are delayed in opening for more than 15 minutes, or are interrupted for more than 15 minutes after opening, the State Board of Elections may extend
the closing time by an equal number of minutes. As authorized by law, the State Board of Elections shall be available either in person or by teleconference on the day of election to approve any such extension. If any voter is in line
to vote at the time the polls are closed, that voter shall be permitted to vote. No voter shall be permitted to vote who arrives at the voting place after the closing of the polls.

Any voter who votes after the statutory poll closing time of 7:30 P.M. by virtue of a federal or State court order or any other lawful order, including an order of a county board of elections, shall be allowed to vote, under the provisions of that order,
only by using a provisional official ballot. Any special provisional official ballots cast under this section shall be separated, counted, and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by other voters not under the effect of the
order extending the closing time of the voting place. If the court order has not been reversed or stayed by the time of the county canvass, the total for that category of provisional ballots shall be added to the official canvass.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2003-226, s. 14; 2013-381, s. 33.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.1.
Duties of county board of elections.

The county board of elections shall:

Provide for the timely delivery to each voting place of the supplies, records, and equipment necessary for the conduct of the election.

Ensure that adequate procedures are in place at each voting place for a safe, secure, fair, and honest election.

Respond to precinct officials’ questions and problems where necessary.

Provide adequate technical support for the voting system, which shall be done in conjunction with the State Board of Elections.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2009-541, s. 21; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.2.
Arrangement of the voting enclosure.

Each voting enclosure shall contain at a minimum:

A sufficient number of private spaces for all voters to mark their official ballots in secrecy.

Adequate space and furniture for the separate functions of:

The checking of voter registration records.

The distribution of official ballots.

Private discussion with voters concerning irregular situations.

A telephone or some facility for communication with the county board of elections.

The equipment and furniture in the voting enclosure shall be arranged so that it can be generally seen from the public space of the enclosure.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.3.
Limited access to the voting enclosure.

Persons Who May Enter Voting Enclosure. — During the time allowed for voting in the voting place, only the following persons may enter the voting enclosure:

An election official.

An observer appointed pursuant to

G.S. 163-45

.

A runner appointed pursuant to

G.S. 163-45

, but only to the extent necessary to announce that runner’s presence and to receive the voter list as provided in G.S. 163-45.

A person seeking to vote in that voting place on that day but only while in the process of voting or seeking to vote.

A voter in that precinct while entering or explaining a challenge pursuant to

G.S. 163-87

or

G.S. 163-88

.

A person authorized under

G.S. 163-166.8

to assist a voter but, except as provided in subdivision (7) of this section, only while assisting that voter.

Minor children of the voter under the age of 18, or minor children under the age of 18 in the care of the voter, but only while accompanying the voter and while under the control of the voter.

Persons conducting or participating in a simulated election within the voting place or voting enclosure, if that simulated election is approved by the county board of elections.

Any other person determined by election officials to have an urgent need to enter the voting enclosure but only to the extent necessary to address that need.

Photographing Voters Prohibited. — No person shall photograph, videotape, or otherwise record the image of any voter within the voting enclosure, except with the permission of both the voter and the chief judge of the precinct. If the voter is a candidate,
only the permission of the voter is required. This subsection shall also apply to one-stop sites under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6. This subsection does not apply to cameras used as a regular part of the security of the facility that is a voting place or one-stop site.

Photographing Voted Ballot Prohibited. — No person shall photograph, videotape, or otherwise record the image of a voted official ballot for any purpose not otherwise permitted under law.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2005-428, s. 1(b); 2007-391, s. 23; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.4.
Limitation on activity in the voting place and in a buffer zone around it.

Buffer Zone. — No person or group of persons shall hinder access, harass others, distribute campaign literature, place political advertising, solicit votes, or otherwise engage in election-related activity in the voting place or in a buffer zone which
shall be prescribed by the county board of elections around the voting place. In determining the dimensions of that buffer zone for each voting place, the county board of elections shall, where practical, set the limit at 50 feet
from the door of entrance to the voting place, measured when that door is closed, but in no event shall it set the limit at more than 50 feet or at less than 25 feet.

Area for Election-Related Activity. — Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the county board of elections shall also provide an area adjacent to the buffer zone for each voting place in which persons or groups of persons may distribute
campaign literature, place political advertising, solicit votes, or otherwise engage in election-related activity.

Special Agreements About Election-Related Activity. — The Executive Director of the State Board of Elections may grant special permission for a county board of elections to enter into an agreement with the owners or managers of a nonpublic building to
use the building as a voting place on the condition that election-related activity as described in subsection (b) of this section not be permitted on their property adjacent to the buffer zone, if the Executive Director finds all
of the following:

That no other suitable voting place can be secured for the precinct.

That the county board will require the chief judge of the precinct to monitor the grounds around the voting place to ensure that the restriction on election-related activity shall apply to all candidates and parties equally.

That the pattern of voting places subject to agreements under this subsection does not disproportionately favor any party, racial or ethnic group, or candidate.

That the county board has attempted to secure as a term of the agreement at least 36 hours prior to the opening of the voting place and at least 36 hours after the close of the voting place, as provided in

G.S. 163-166.01

, for candidates to place and retrieve political advertising. The agreement may also provide that any political advertising placed outside the times specified in this subsection may be removed by the property
owner. An agreement under this subsection shall be valid for as long as the nonpublic building is used as a voting place.

Notice About Buffer Zone and Area for Election-Related Activity. — No later than 30 days before each election, the county board of elections shall make available to the public the following information concerning each voting place:

The door from which the buffer zone is measured.

The distance the buffer zone extends from that door.

Any available information concerning where political activity, including sign placement, is permitted beyond the buffer zone.

Buffer Zone and Area for Election-Related Activity at One-Stop Sites. — Except as modified in this subsection, the provisions of this section shall apply to one-stop voting sites in

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6.

Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply.

The notice in subsection (d) of this section shall be provided no later than 10 days before the opening of one-stop voting at the site.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2003-365, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 13; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 22(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(c); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-119, s. 1.5(b).

§ 163-166.5.
Procedures at voting place before voting begins.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for precinct officials to set up the voting place before voting begins. Those rules shall emphasize:

Continual participation or monitoring by officials of more than one party.

Security of official ballots, records, and equipment.

The appearance as well as the reality of care, efficiency, impartiality, and honest election administration.

The county boards of elections and precinct officials shall adhere to those procedures.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.6.
Designation of tasks.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the delegation of tasks among the election officials at each precinct. Those rules shall emphasize:

The need to place primary managerial responsibility upon the chief judge.

The need to have maximum multiparty participation in all duties where questions of partisan partiality might be raised.

The need to provide flexibility of management to the county board of elections and to the chief judge, in consideration of different abilities of officials, the different availability of officials, and the different needs of voters precinct by precinct.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.7.
Voting procedures.

Checking Registration. — A person seeking to vote shall enter the voting enclosure through the appropriate entrance. A precinct official assigned to check registration shall at once ask the voter to state current name and residence address. The voter
shall answer by stating current name and residence address and presenting photo identification in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.16

. In a primary election, that voter shall also be asked to state, and shall state, the political party with which the voter is affiliated or, if unaffiliated, the authorizing party in which the voter wishes to vote.
After examination, that official shall state whether that voter is duly registered to vote in that precinct and shall direct that voter to the voting equipment or to the official assigned to distribute official ballots. If a precinct
official states that the person is duly registered, the person shall sign the pollbook, other voting record, or voter authorization document in accordance with subsection (c) of this section before voting.

Distribution of Official Ballots. — If the voter is found to be duly registered and has not been successfully challenged, the official assigned to distribute the official ballots shall hand the voter the official ballot that voter is entitled to vote,
or that voter shall be directed to the voting equipment that contains the official ballot. No voter in a primary shall be permitted to vote in more than one party’s primary. The precinct officials shall provide the voter with any
information the voter requests to enable that voter to vote as that voter desires.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the process of voting. Those rules shall emphasize the appearance as well as the reality of dignity, good order, impartiality, and the convenience and privacy of the voter. Those rules, at a minimum,
shall include procedures to ensure that all the following occur:

The voting system remains secure throughout the period voting is being conducted.

Only properly voted official ballots are introduced into the voting system.

Except as provided by

G.S. 163-166.9

, no official ballots leave the voting enclosure during the time voting is being conducted there. The rules shall also provide that during that time no one shall remove from the voting enclosure any paper
record or copy of an individually voted ballot or of any other device or item whose removal from the voting enclosure could permit compromise of the integrity of either the machine count or the paper record.

All improperly voted official ballots are returned to the precinct officials and marked as spoiled.

Voters leave the voting place promptly after voting.

Voters not clearly eligible to vote in the precinct but who seek to vote there are given proper assistance in voting a provisional official ballot or guidance to another voting place where they are eligible to vote.

Information gleaned through the voting process that would be helpful to the accurate maintenance of the voter registration records is recorded and delivered to the county board of elections.

The registration records are kept secure. The State Board of Elections shall permit the use of electronic registration records in the voting place in lieu of or in addition to a paper pollbook or other registration record.

Party observers are given access as provided by

G.S. 163-45

to current information about which voters have voted.

The voter, before voting, shall sign that voter’s name on the pollbook, other voting record, or voter authorization document. If the voter is unable to sign, a precinct official shall enter the person’s name on the same document before the voter votes.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2003-226, s. 14.1; 2005-323, s. 1(a1); 2005-428, s. 12; 2013-381, ss. 2.5, 30.4; 2015-103, s. 6(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.11(b); 2018-144, s. 1.4(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-166.7. Voting procedures.

Checking Registration. - A person seeking to vote shall enter the voting enclosure through the appropriate entrance. A precinct official assigned to check registration shall at once ask the voter to state current name and residence address. The voter
shall answer by stating current name and residence address. In a primary election, that voter shall also be asked to state, and shall state, the political party with which the voter is affiliated or, if unaffiliated, the authorizing
party in which the voter wishes to vote. After examination, that official shall state whether that voter is duly registered to vote in that precinct and shall direct that voter to the voting equipment or to the official assigned
to distribute official ballots. If a precinct official states that the person is duly registered, the person shall sign the pollbook, other voting record, or voter authorization document in accordance with subsection (c) of this
section before voting.

Distribution of Official Ballots. - If the voter is found to be duly registered and has not been successfully challenged, the official assigned to distribute the official ballots shall hand the voter the official ballot that voter is entitled to vote,
or that voter shall be directed to the voting equipment that contains the official ballot. No voter in a primary shall be permitted to vote in more than one party’s primary. The precinct officials shall provide the voter with any
information the voter requests to enable that voter to vote as that voter desires.

(Effective until January 1, 2018) The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the process of voting. Those rules shall emphasize the appearance as well as the reality of dignity, good order, impartiality, and the convenience and privacy of
the voter. Those rules, at a minimum, shall include procedures to ensure that all the following occur:

The voting system remains secure throughout the period voting is being conducted.

Only properly voted official ballots or paper records of individual voted ballots are introduced into the voting system.

Except as provided by

G.S. 163-166.9

, no official ballots leave the voting enclosure during the time voting is being conducted there. The rules shall also provide that during that time no one shall remove from the voting enclosure any paper
record or copy of an individually voted ballot or of any other device or item whose removal from the voting enclosure could permit compromise of the integrity of either the machine count or the paper record.

All improperly voted official ballots or paper records of individual voted ballots are returned to the precinct officials and marked as spoiled.

Voters leave the voting place promptly after voting.

Voters not clearly eligible to vote in the precinct but who seek to vote there are given proper assistance in voting a provisional official ballot or guidance to another voting place where they are eligible to vote.

Information gleaned through the voting process that would be helpful to the accurate maintenance of the voter registration records is recorded and delivered to the county board of elections.

The registration records are kept secure. The State Board of Elections shall permit the use of electronic registration records in the voting place in lieu of or in addition to a paper pollbook or other registration record.

Party observers are given access as provided by

G.S. 163-45

to current information about which voters have voted.

The voter, before voting, shall sign that voter’s name on the pollbook, other voting record, or voter authorization document. If the voter is unable to sign, a precinct official shall enter the person’s name on the same document before the voter does.

(c)

(Effective January 1, 2018)
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the process of voting. Those rules shall emphasize the appearance as well as the reality of dignity, good order, impartiality, and the convenience and privacy of the
voter. Those rules, at a minimum, shall include procedures to ensure that all the following occur:

(1) The voting system remains secure throughout the period voting is being conducted.

(2) Only properly voted official ballots or paper records of individual voted ballots are introduced into the voting system.

(3) Except as provided by

G.S. 163-166.9

, no official ballots leave the voting enclosure during the time voting is being conducted there. The rules shall also provide that during that time no one shall remove from the voting enclosure any paper record or copy
of an individually voted ballot or of any other device or item whose removal from the voting enclosure could permit compromise of the integrity of either the machine count or the paper record.

(4) All improperly voted official ballots or paper records of individual voted ballots are returned to the precinct officials and marked as spoiled.

(5) Voters leave the voting place promptly after voting.

(6) Voters not clearly eligible to vote in the precinct but who seek to vote there are given proper assistance in voting a provisional official ballot or guidance to another voting place where they are eligible to vote.

(7) Information gleaned through the voting process that would be helpful to the accurate maintenance of the voter registration records is recorded and delivered to the county board of elections.

(8) The registration records are kept secure. The State Board of Elections shall permit the use of electronic registration records in the voting place in lieu of or in addition to a paper pollbook or other registration record.

(9) Party observers are given access as provided by

G.S. 163-45

to current information about which voters have voted.

(10) The voter, before voting, shall sign that voter’s name on the pollbook, other voting record, or voter authorization document. If the voter is unable to sign, a precinct official shall enter the person’s name on the same document before the voter
does.

§ 163-166.7A.
Voter education and information.

Posting the Information. — For each election that involves candidates for federal or State office, each county board of elections shall post at each active voting place the following information in a manner and format approved by the State Board of Elections:

A sample ballot as required by 163-165.2.

The date of the election and the hours the voting place will be open.

Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote or correct a vote on the voting systems available for use in that voting place.

Instructions on how to cast a provisional ballot.

Instructions to mail-in registrants and first-time voters on how to comply with the requirements in section 303(b) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 concerning voter identifications.

General information on voting rights under applicable federal and State law, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if the voter believes those rights
have been violated.

General information on federal and State laws that prohibit acts of fraud and misrepresentation as to voting and elections.

Intent. — The posting required by subsection (a) of this section is intended to meet the mandate of the voting information requirements in section 302(b) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

History.
2003-226, s. 8; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.8.
Assistance to voters.

Any registered voter qualified to vote in the election shall be entitled to assistance with entering and exiting the voting booth and in preparing ballots in accordance with the following rules:

Any voter is entitled to assistance from the voter’s spouse, brother, sister, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, mother-in-law, father-in-law, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, stepparent, or stepchild, as chosen by the voter.

A voter in any of the following four categories is entitled to assistance from a person of the voter’s choice, other than the voter’s employer or agent of that employer or an officer or agent of the voter’s union:

A voter who, on account of physical disability, is unable to enter the voting booth without assistance.

A voter who, on account of physical disability, is unable to mark a ballot without assistance.

A voter who, on account of illiteracy, is unable to mark a ballot without assistance.

A voter who, on account of blindness, is unable to enter the voting booth or mark a ballot without assistance.

A qualified voter seeking assistance in an election shall, upon arriving at the voting place, request permission from the chief judge to have assistance, stating the reasons. If the chief judge determines that such assistance is appropriate, the chief
judge shall ask the voter to point out and identify the person the voter desires to provide such assistance. If the identified person meets the criteria in subsection (a) of this section, the chief judge shall request the person
indicated to render the assistance. The chief judge, one of the judges, or one of the assistants may provide aid to the voter if so requested, if the election official is not prohibited by subdivision (a) (2) of this section. Under
no circumstances shall any precinct official be assigned to assist a voter qualified for assistance, who was not specified by the voter.

A person rendering assistance to a voter in an election shall be admitted to the voting booth with the voter being assisted. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules governing voter assistance, and those rules shall adhere to the following
guidelines:

The person rendering assistance shall not in any manner seek to persuade or induce any voter to cast any vote in any particular way.

The person rendering assistance shall not make or keep any memorandum of anything which occurs within the voting booth.

The person rendering assistance shall not, directly or indirectly, reveal to any person how the assisted voter marked ballots, unless the person rendering assistance is called upon to testify in a judicial proceeding for a violation of the election laws.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.9.
Curbside voting.

In any election or referendum, if any qualified voter is able to travel to the voting place, but because of age or physical disability and physical barriers encountered at the voting place is unable to enter the voting enclosure to vote in person without
physical assistance, that voter shall be allowed to vote either in the vehicle conveying that voter or in the immediate proximity of the voting place.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(d), effective December 19, 2018.

The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules for the administration of this section.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2013-381, s. 2.6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.1(d); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-166.9. Curbside voting.

In any election or referendum, if any qualified voter is able to travel to the voting place, but because of age or physical disability and physical barriers encountered at the voting place is unable to enter the voting enclosure to vote in person without
physical assistance, that voter shall be allowed to vote either in the vehicle conveying that voter or in the immediate proximity of the voting place. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the administration of this
section.

§ 163-166.10.
Procedures after the close of voting.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for closing the voting place and delivering voting information to the county board of elections for counting, canvassing, and record maintenance. Those rules shall emphasize the need for the appearance
as well as the reality of security, accuracy, participation by representatives of more than one political party, openness of the process to public inspection, and honesty. The rules, at a minimum, shall include procedures to ensure
all of the following:

The return and accurate accounting of all official ballots, regular, provisional, voted, unvoted, and spoiled, according to the provisions of Article 15A of this Chapter.

The certification of ballots and voter-authorization documents by precinct officials of more than one political party.

The delivery to the county board of elections of registration documents and information gleaned through the voting process that would be helpful in the accurate maintenance of the voter registration records.

The return to the county board of all issued equipment.

The restoration of the voting place to the condition in which it was found.

History.
2001-460, ss. 3, 3.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-166.11.
Provisional voting requirements.

If an individual seeking to vote claims to be a registered voter in a jurisdiction as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

and though eligible to vote in the election does not appear on the official list of eligible registered voters in the voting place, that individual may cast a provisional official ballot as follows:

An election official at the voting place shall notify the individual that the individual may cast a provisional official ballot in that election.

The individual may cast a provisional official ballot at that voting place upon executing a written affirmation before an election official at the voting place, stating that the individual is a registered voter in the jurisdiction as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

in which the individual seeks to vote and is eligible to vote in that election.

A voter who has moved within the county more than 30 days before election day but has not reported the move to the board of elections shall not be required on that account to vote a provisional ballot at the one-stop site, as long as the one-stop site
has available all the information necessary to determine whether a voter is registered to vote in the county and which ballot the voter is eligible to vote based on the voter’s proper residence address. The voter with that kind
of unreported move shall be allowed to vote the same kind of absentee ballot as other one-stop voters as provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

.

At the time the individual casts the provisional official ballot, the election officials shall provide the individual written information stating that anyone casting a provisional official ballot can ascertain whether and to what extent the ballot was
counted and, if the ballot was not counted in whole or in part, the reason it was not counted. The State Board of Elections or the county board of elections shall establish a system for so informing a provisional voter. It shall
make the system available to every provisional voter without charge, and it shall build into it reasonable procedures to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the voter’s personal information and vote.

The cast provisional official ballot and the written affirmation shall be secured by election officials at the voting place according to guidelines and procedures adopted by the State Board of Elections. At the close of the polls, election officials shall
transmit the provisional official ballots cast at that voting place to the county board of elections for prompt verification according to guidelines and procedures adopted by the State Board of Elections. No later than 12:00 P.M.
two days after the close of the polls, the county board of elections shall publish the number of provisional ballots cast on election day, cast by one-stop absentee voting, cast by mail-in absentee ballots received as of election
day, and cast by military and overseas absentee ballots cast under Article 21A of this Chapter and received as of election day.

History.
2003-226, s. 15; 2005-2, s. 4; 2005-428, s. 6(b); 2013-381, s. 49.3; 2014-111, s. 12(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-17, s. 4.5(b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-166.11. Provisional voting requirements.

If an individual seeking to vote claims to be a registered voter in a jurisdiction as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

and though eligible to vote in the election does not appear on the official list of eligible registered voters in the voting place, that individual may cast a provisional official ballot as follows:

An election official at the voting place shall notify the individual that the individual may cast a provisional official ballot in that election.

The individual may cast a provisional official ballot at that voting place upon executing a written affirmation before an election official at the voting place, stating that the individual is a registered voter in the jurisdiction as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

in which the individual seeks to vote and is eligible to vote in that election.

At the time the individual casts the provisional official ballot, the election officials shall provide the individual written information stating that anyone casting a provisional official ballot can ascertain whether and to what extent the ballot was
counted and, if the ballot was not counted in whole or in part, the reason it was not counted. The State Board of Elections or the county board of elections shall establish a system for so informing a provisional voter. It shall
make the system available to every provisional voter without charge, and it shall build into it reasonable procedures to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the voter’s personal information and vote.

The cast provisional official ballot and the written affirmation shall be secured by election officials at the voting place according to guidelines and procedures adopted by the State Board of Elections. At the close of the polls, election officials shall
transmit the provisional official ballots cast at that voting place to the county board of elections for prompt verification according to guidelines and procedures adopted by the State Board of Elections.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-111, s. 12(b), effective August 6, 2014. ( 2003-226, s. 15; 2005-2, s. 4; 2005-428, s. 6(b); 2013-381, s. 49.3; 2014-111, s. 12(b).)

(2a) A voter who has moved within the county more than 30 days before election day but has not reported the move to the board of elections shall not be required on that account to vote a provisional ballot at the onestop site, as long as the one-stop
site has available all the information necessary to determine whether a voter is registered to vote in the county and which ballot the voter is eligible to vote based on the voter’s proper residence address. The voter with that kind
of unreported move shall be allowed to vote the same kind of absentee ballot as other one-stop voters as provided in G.S. 163-227.2(e2).

§ 163-166.11A.
Notation on provisional ballot.

Whenever a voter is permitted to vote a provisional ballot, the election official issuing the ballot shall annotate in writing or other means on the ballot that it is a provisional ballot.

History.
2013-381, s. 52.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).